Vermont, session 2025-2026, H175.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 21 V.S.A. § 1343 is amended to read:
§ 1343. CONDITIONS
* * *
(c) Benefits are payable on the basis of service in employment as defined in
subdivisions 1301(6)(A)(ix) and (x) of this subchapter, in the same amount, on
VT LEG #379943 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.175
2025 Page 2 of 5
the same terms, and subject to the same conditions as benefits payable on the
basis of other service subject to this chapter, except that:
(1) With respect to services performed in an instructional, research, or
principal administrative capacity for an educational institution, benefits shall
not be payable on the basis of such services for any week of unemployment
commencing during the period between two successive academic years or
terms (or, when an agreement provides instead for a similar period between
two regular but not successive terms, during such period) or during a period of
paid sabbatical leave provided for in the individual’s contract, to any
individual if the individual performs such services in the first of the academic
years or terms and if there is a contract or reasonable assurance that the
individual will perform services in any such capacity for any educational
institution in the second of the academic years or terms.
(2) With respect to services performed in any other capacity for an
educational institution, benefits shall not be payable on the basis of such
services to any individual for any week of unemployment that commences
during a period between two successive academic years or terms if the
individual performs such services in the first of the academic years or terms
and there is a reasonable assurance that the individual will perform such
services for any educational institution in the second of the academic years or
terms, except that if benefits are denied to any individual under this
VT LEG #379943 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.175
2025 Page 3 of 5
subdivision and the individual was not offered an opportunity to perform such
services for the educational institution for the second of the academic years or
terms, the individual shall be entitled to a retroactive payment of the benefits
for each week for which the individual filed a timely claim for benefits and for
which benefits were denied solely by reason of this subdivision.
(3) With respect to any services described in subdivision (1) or (2) of
this subsection, benefits shall not be payable on the basis of services in any
such capacities to any individual for any week that commences during an
established and customary vacation period or holiday recess if the individual
performs such services in the period immediately before the vacation period or
holiday recess, and there is a reasonable assurance that the individual will
perform such services in the period immediately following the vacation period
or holiday recess. To the extent permitted by federal law, as used in this
subdivision, the term “reasonable assurance” means that all of the following
requirements shall be met:
(A) The educational institution has made an offer of employment in
the following academic year or term that is either written, oral, or implied.
(B) The offer of employment in the following academic year or term
was made by an individual with actual authority to offer employment.
(C) The employment offered in the following academic year or term
shall be in the same capacity as in the then-current academic year or term.
VT LEG #379943 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.175
2025 Page 4 of 5
(D) The economic conditions of the employment offered may not be
considerably less in the following academic year or term than in the then-
current academic year or term. As used in this subdivision (D), “considerably
less” means that the individual will earn less than 90 percent of the amount the
individual earned in the then-current academic year or term.
(E) The offer of employment in the following academic year or term
is not contingent upon a factor or factors within the educational institution’s
control, such as course programming, allocation of available funding, final
course offerings, program changes, or facility availability.
(F) Based on the totality of the circumstances, it is highly probable
that there is a job available for the individual in the following academic term or
year. If a job offer contains a contingency, primary weight should be given to
the contingent nature of the offer of employment. Contingencies that are not
necessarily within the educational institution’s control, such as funding,
enrollment, and seniority, may be taken into consideration, but the existence of
any one contingency should not determine whether it is highly probable that
there is a job available for the claimant in the following academic year or term.
(4) With respect to any services described in subdivision (1) or (2) of
this subsection, benefits shall not be payable on the basis of services in any
such capacities as specified in subdivisions (1), (2), and (3) of this subsection
to any individual who performed such services in an educational institution
VT LEG #379943 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.175
2025 Page 5 of 5
while in the employ of an educational service agency. As used in this
subdivision, the term “educational service agency” means a governmental
agency or governmental entity that is established and operated exclusively for
the purpose of providing such services to one or more educational institutions.
* * *
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #379943 v.1